Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.099, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Paydays; mileage; per diem. new text begin (a) new text end The compensation of each member of the legislature is due on the first day of the regular legislative session of the term and payable in equal parts on January 15, in the first month of each term and on the first day of each following month during the term for which the member was elected. The compensation of each member of the legislature elected at a special election is due on the day the member takes the oath of office and payable within ten days of taking the oath for the remaining part of the month in which the oath was taken, and then in equal parts on the first day of each following month during the term for which the member was elected. new text begin (b) new text end Each member shall receive mileage for necessary travel to the place of meeting and returning to the member's residence in the amount and for trips as authorized by the senate for senate members and by the house of representatives for house members. deleted text begin Each member shall also receive per diem living expenses during a regular or special session of the legislaturedeleted text end new text begin (c) A member is prohibited from receiving per diem payments during a regular session of the legislature. When the legislature is not meeting in regular session, a member may receive a per diem paymentnew text end in the amounts and for the purposes as determined by the senate for senate members and by the house of representatives for house members. new text begin (d) new text end On January 15 in the first month of each term and on the first day of each following month, the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall certify to the commissioner of management and budget, in duplicate, the amount of compensation then payable to each member of their respective houses and its total. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.099, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Compensation limited. new text end new text begin A legislator must not receive compensation for work as a legislator, except for the following compensation: new text end new text begin (1) a salary prescribed by the Legislative Salary Council under section 15A.0825; new text end new text begin (2) a state contribution to insurance benefits provided to all state employees under chapter 43A; new text end new text begin (3) a state contribution to the legislator's retirement plan under chapter 3A or 352D; and new text end new text begin (4) compensation provided under this section and sections 3.101 and 3.103. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective July 1, 2027. new text end